Ohio, session 136, HB367.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 4511.01, 4511.042, 4511.213, 5
4511.45, 4513.17, and 4513.21 of the Revised Code be amended to 6
read as follows: 7
Sec. 4511.01. As used in this chapter and in Chapter 4513. 8
of the Revised Code: 9
(A) "Vehicle" means every device, including a motorized 10
bicycle and an electric bicycle, in, upon, or by which any 11
person or property may be transported or drawn upon a highway, 12
except that "vehicle" does not include any motorized wheelchair, 13
any electric personal assistive mobility device, any low-speed 14
micromobility device, any personal delivery device as defined in 15
section 4511.513 of the Revised Code, any device that is moved 16

H. B. No. 367 Page 2
As Introduced
by power collected from overhead electric trolley wires or that 17
is used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks, or any 18
device, other than a bicycle, that is moved by human power. 19
(B) "Motor vehicle" means every vehicle propelled or drawn 20
by power other than muscular power or power collected from 21
overhead electric trolley wires, except motorized bicycles, 22
electric bicycles, road rollers, traction engines, power 23
shovels, power cranes, and other equipment used in construction 24
work and not designed for or employed in general highway 25
transportation, hole-digging machinery, well-drilling machinery, 26
ditch-digging machinery, farm machinery, and trailers designed 27
and used exclusively to transport a boat between a place of 28
storage and a marina, or in and around a marina, when drawn or 29
towed on a street or highway for a distance of no more than ten 30
miles and at a speed of twenty-five miles per hour or less. 31
(C) "Motorcycle" means every motor vehicle, other than a 32
tractor, having a seat or saddle for the use of the operator and 33
designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with 34
the ground, including, but not limited to, motor vehicles known 35
as "motor-driven cycle," "motor scooter," "autocycle," "cab- 36
enclosed motorcycle," or "motorcycle" without regard to weight 37
or brake horsepower. 38
(D) "Emergency vehicle" means emergency vehicles of 39
municipal, township, or county departments or public utility 40
corporations when identified as such as required by law, the 41
director of public safety, or local authorities, and motor 42
vehicles when commandeered by a police officer. 43
(E) "Public safety vehicle" means any of the following: 44
(1) Ambulances, including private ambulance companies 45

H. B. No. 367 Page 3
As Introduced
under contract to a municipal corporation, township, or county, 46
and private ambulances and nontransport vehicles bearing license 47
plates issued under section 4503.49 of the Revised Code; 48
(2) Motor vehicles used by public law enforcement officers 49
or other persons sworn to enforce the criminal and traffic laws 50
of the state; 51
(3) Any motor vehicle when properly identified as required 52
by the director of public safety, when used in response to fire 53
emergency calls or to provide emergency medical service to ill 54
or injured persons, and when operated by a duly qualified person 55
who is a member of a volunteer rescue service or a volunteer 56
fire department, and who is on duty pursuant to the rules or 57
directives of that service. The state fire marshal shall be 58
designated by the director of public safety as the certifying 59
agency for all public safety vehicles described in division (E) 60
(3) of this section. 61
(4) Vehicles used by fire departments, including motor 62
vehicles when used by volunteer fire fighters responding to 63
emergency calls in the fire department service when identified 64
as required by the director of public safety. 65
Any vehicle used to transport or provide emergency medical 66
service to an ill or injured person, when certified as a public 67
safety vehicle, shall be considered a public safety vehicle when 68
transporting an ill or injured person to a hospital regardless 69
of whether such vehicle has already passed a hospital. 70
(5) Vehicles used by the motor carrier enforcement unit 71
for the enforcement of orders and rules of the public utilities 72
commission as specified in section 5503.34 of the Revised Code. 73
(F) "School bus" means every bus designed for carrying 74

H. B. No. 367 Page 4
As Introduced
more than nine passengers that is owned by a public, private, or 75
governmental agency or institution of learning and operated for 76
the transportation of children to or from a school session or a 77
school function, or owned by a private person and operated for 78
compensation for the transportation of children to or from a 79
school session or a school function, provided "school bus" does 80
not include a bus operated by a municipally owned transportation 81
system, a mass transit company operating exclusively within the 82
territorial limits of a municipal corporation, or within such 83
limits and the territorial limits of municipal corporations 84
immediately contiguous to such municipal corporation, nor a 85
common passenger carrier certified by the public utilities 86
commission unless such bus is devoted exclusively to the 87
transportation of children to and from a school session or a 88
school function, and "school bus" does not include a van or bus 89
used by a licensed child care center or type A family child care 90
home to transport children from the child care center or type A 91
family child care home to a school if the van or bus does not 92
have more than fifteen children in the van or bus at any time. 93
(G) "Bicycle" means every device, other than a device that 94
is designed solely for use as a play vehicle by a child, that is 95
propelled solely by human power upon which a person may ride, 96
and that has two or more wheels, any of which is more than 97
fourteen inches in diameter. 98
(H) "Motorized bicycle" or "moped" means any vehicle 99
having either two tandem wheels or one wheel in the front and 100
two wheels in the rear, that may be pedaled, and that is 101
equipped with a helper motor of not more than fifty cubic 102
centimeters piston displacement that produces not more than one 103
brake horsepower and is capable of propelling the vehicle at a 104
speed of not greater than twenty miles per hour on a level 105

H. B. No. 367 Page 5
As Introduced
surface. "Motorized bicycle" or "moped" does not include an 106
electric bicycle. 107
(I) "Commercial tractor" means every motor vehicle having 108
motive power designed or used for drawing other vehicles and not 109
so constructed as to carry any load thereon, or designed or used 110
for drawing other vehicles while carrying a portion of such 111
other vehicles, or load thereon, or both. 112
(J) "Agricultural tractor" means every self-propelling 113
vehicle designed or used for drawing other vehicles or wheeled 114
machinery but having no provision for carrying loads 115
independently of such other vehicles, and used principally for 116
agricultural purposes. 117
(K) "Truck" means every motor vehicle, except trailers and 118
semitrailers, designed and used to carry property. 119
(L) "Bus" means every motor vehicle designed for carrying 120
more than nine passengers and used for the transportation of 121
persons other than in a ridesharing arrangement, and every motor 122
vehicle, automobile for hire, or funeral car, other than a 123
taxicab or motor vehicle used in a ridesharing arrangement, 124
designed and used for the transportation of persons for 125
compensation. 126
(M) "Trailer" means every vehicle designed or used for 127
carrying persons or property wholly on its own structure and for 128
being drawn by a motor vehicle, including any such vehicle when 129
formed by or operated as a combination of a "semitrailer" and a 130
vehicle of the dolly type, such as that commonly known as a 131
"trailer dolly," a vehicle used to transport agricultural 132
produce or agricultural production materials between a local 133
place of storage or supply and the farm when drawn or towed on a 134

H. B. No. 367 Page 6
As Introduced
street or highway at a speed greater than twenty-five miles per 135
hour, and a vehicle designed and used exclusively to transport a 136
boat between a place of storage and a marina, or in and around a 137
marina, when drawn or towed on a street or highway for a 138
distance of more than ten miles or at a speed of more than 139
twenty-five miles per hour. 140
(N) "Semitrailer" means every vehicle designed or used for 141
carrying persons or property with another and separate motor 142
vehicle so that in operation a part of its own weight or that of 143
its load, or both, rests upon and is carried by another vehicle. 144
(O) "Pole trailer" means every trailer or semitrailer 145
attached to the towing vehicle by means of a reach, pole, or by 146
being boomed or otherwise secured to the towing vehicle, and 147
ordinarily used for transporting long or irregular shaped loads 148
such as poles, pipes, or structural members capable, generally, 149
of sustaining themselves as beams between the supporting 150
connections. 151
(P) "Railroad" means a carrier of persons or property 152
operating upon rails placed principally on a private right-of- 153
way. 154
(Q) "Railroad train" means a steam engine or an electric 155
or other motor, with or without cars coupled thereto, operated 156
by a railroad. 157
(R) "Streetcar" means a car, other than a railroad train, 158
for transporting persons or property, operated upon rails 159
principally within a street or highway. 160
(S) "Trackless trolley" means every car that collects its 161
power from overhead electric trolley wires and that is not 162
operated upon rails or tracks. 163

H. B. No. 367 Page 7
As Introduced
(T) "Explosives" means any chemical compound or mechanical 164
mixture that is intended for the purpose of producing an 165
explosion that contains any oxidizing and combustible units or 166
other ingredients in such proportions, quantities, or packing 167
that an ignition by fire, by friction, by concussion, by 168
percussion, or by a detonator of any part of the compound or 169
mixture may cause such a sudden generation of highly heated 170
gases that the resultant gaseous pressures are capable of 171
producing destructive effects on contiguous objects, or of 172
destroying life or limb. Manufactured articles shall not be held 173
to be explosives when the individual units contain explosives in 174
such limited quantities, of such nature, or in such packing, 175
that it is impossible to procure a simultaneous or a destructive 176
explosion of such units, to the injury of life, limb, or 177
property by fire, by friction, by concussion, by percussion, or 178
by a detonator, such as fixed ammunition for small arms, 179
firecrackers, or safety fuse matches. 180
(U) "Flammable liquid" means any liquid that has a flash 181
point of seventy degrees fahrenheit, or less, as determined by a 182
tagliabue or equivalent closed cup test device. 183
(V) "Gross weight" means the weight of a vehicle plus the 184
weight of any load thereon. 185
(W) "Person" means every natural person, firm, co- 186
partnership, association, or corporation. 187
(X) "Pedestrian" means any natural person afoot. 188
"Pedestrian" includes a personal delivery device as defined in 189
section 4511.513 of the Revised Code unless the context clearly 190
suggests otherwise. 191
(Y) "Driver or operator" means every person who drives or 192

H. B. No. 367 Page 8
As Introduced
is in actual physical control of a vehicle, trackless trolley, 193
or streetcar. 194
(Z) "Police officer" means every officer authorized to 195
direct or regulate traffic, or to make arrests for violations of 196
traffic regulations. 197
(AA) "Local authorities" means every county, municipal, 198
and other local board or body having authority to adopt police 199
regulations under the constitution and laws of this state. 200
(BB) "Street" or "highway" means the entire width between 201
the boundary lines of every way open to the use of the public as 202
a thoroughfare for purposes of vehicular travel. 203
(CC) "Controlled-access highway" means every street or 204
highway in respect to which owners or occupants of abutting 205
lands and other persons have no legal right of access to or from 206
the same except at such points only and in such manner as may be 207
determined by the public authority having jurisdiction over such 208
street or highway. 209
(DD) "Private road or driveway" means every way or place 210
in private ownership used for vehicular travel by the owner and 211
those having express or implied permission from the owner but 212
not by other persons. 213
(EE) "Roadway" means that portion of a highway improved, 214
designed, or ordinarily used for vehicular travel, except the 215
berm or shoulder. If a highway includes two or more separate 216
roadways the term "roadway" means any such roadway separately 217
but not all such roadways collectively. 218
(FF) "Sidewalk" means that portion of a street between the 219
curb lines, or the lateral lines of a roadway, and the adjacent 220
property lines, intended for the use of pedestrians. 221

H. B. No. 367 Page 9
As Introduced
(GG) "Laned highway" means a highway the roadway of which 222
is divided into two or more clearly marked lanes for vehicular 223
traffic. 224
(HH) "Through highway" means every street or highway as 225
provided in section 4511.65 of the Revised Code. 226
(II) "State highway" means a highway under the 227
jurisdiction of the department of transportation, outside the 228
limits of municipal corporations, provided that the authority 229
conferred upon the director of transportation in section 5511.01 230
of the Revised Code to erect state highway route markers and 231
signs directing traffic shall not be modified by sections 232
4511.01 to 4511.79 and 4511.99 of the Revised Code. 233
(JJ) "State route" means every highway that is designated 234
with an official state route number and so marked. 235
(KK) "Intersection" means: 236
(1) The area embraced within the prolongation or 237
connection of the lateral curb lines, or, if none, the lateral 238
boundary lines of the roadways of two highways that join one 239
another at, or approximately at, right angles, or the area 240
within which vehicles traveling upon different highways that 241
join at any other angle might come into conflict. The junction 242
of an alley or driveway with a roadway or highway does not 243
constitute an intersection unless the roadway or highway at the 244
junction is controlled by a traffic control device. 245
(2) If a highway includes two roadways that are thirty 246
feet or more apart, then every crossing of each roadway of such 247
divided highway by an intersecting highway constitutes a 248
separate intersection. If both intersecting highways include two 249
roadways thirty feet or more apart, then every crossing of any 250

H. B. No. 367 Page 10
As Introduced
two roadways of such highways constitutes a separate 251
intersection. 252
(3) At a location controlled by a traffic control signal, 253
regardless of the distance between the separate intersections as 254
described in division (KK)(2) of this section: 255
(a) If a stop line, yield line, or crosswalk has not been 256
designated on the roadway within the median between the separate 257
intersections, the two intersections and the roadway and median 258
constitute one intersection. 259
(b) Where a stop line, yield line, or crosswalk line is 260
designated on the roadway on the intersection approach, the area 261
within the crosswalk and any area beyond the designated stop 262
line or yield line constitute part of the intersection. 263
(c) Where a crosswalk is designated on a roadway on the 264
departure from the intersection, the intersection includes the 265
area that extends to the far side of the crosswalk. 266
(LL) "Crosswalk" means: 267
(1) That part of a roadway at intersections ordinarily 268
included within the real or projected prolongation of property 269
lines and curb lines or, in the absence of curbs, the edges of 270
the traversable roadway; 271
(2) Any portion of a roadway at an intersection or 272
elsewhere, distinctly indicated for pedestrian crossing by lines 273
or other markings on the surface; 274
(3) Notwithstanding divisions (LL)(1) and (2) of this 275
section, there shall not be a crosswalk where local authorities 276
have placed signs indicating no crossing. 277
(MM) "Safety zone" means the area or space officially set 278

H. B. No. 367 Page 11
As Introduced
apart within a roadway for the exclusive use of pedestrians and 279
protected or marked or indicated by adequate signs as to be 280
plainly visible at all times. 281
(NN) "Business district" means the territory fronting upon 282
a street or highway, including the street or highway, between 283
successive intersections within municipal corporations where 284
fifty per cent or more of the frontage between such successive 285
intersections is occupied by buildings in use for business, or 286
within or outside municipal corporations where fifty per cent or 287
more of the frontage for a distance of three hundred feet or 288
more is occupied by buildings in use for business, and the 289
character of such territory is indicated by official traffic 290
control devices. 291
(OO) "Residence district" means the territory, not 292
comprising a business district, fronting on a street or highway, 293
including the street or highway, where, for a distance of three 294
hundred feet or more, the frontage is improved with residences 295
or residences and buildings in use for business. 296
(PP) "Urban district" means the territory contiguous to 297
and including any street or highway which is built up with 298
structures devoted to business, industry, or dwelling houses 299
situated at intervals of less than one hundred feet for a 300
distance of a quarter of a mile or more, and the character of 301
such territory is indicated by official traffic control devices. 302
(QQ) "Traffic control device" means a flagger, sign, 303
signal, marking, or other device used to regulate, warn, or 304
guide traffic, placed on, over, or adjacent to a street, 305
highway, private road open to public travel, pedestrian 306
facility, or shared-use path by authority of a public agency or 307
official having jurisdiction, or, in the case of a private road 308

H. B. No. 367 Page 12
As Introduced
open to public travel, by authority of the private owner or 309
private official having jurisdiction. 310
(RR) "Traffic control signal" means any highway traffic 311
signal by which traffic is alternately directed to stop and 312
permitted to proceed. 313
(SS) "Railroad sign or signal" means any sign, signal, or 314
device erected by authority of a public body or official or by a 315
railroad and intended to give notice of the presence of railroad 316
tracks or the approach of a railroad train. 317
(TT) "Traffic" means pedestrians, ridden or herded 318
animals, vehicles, streetcars, trackless trolleys, and other 319
devices, either singly or together, while using for purposes of 320
travel any highway or private road open to public travel. 321
(UU) "Right-of-way" means either of the following, as the 322
context requires: 323
(1) The right of a vehicle, streetcar, trackless trolley, 324
or pedestrian to proceed uninterruptedly in a lawful manner in 325
the direction in which it or the individual is moving in 326
preference to another vehicle, streetcar, trackless trolley, or 327
pedestrian approaching from a different direction into its or 328
the individual's path; 329
(2) A general term denoting land, property, or the 330
interest therein, usually in the configuration of a strip, 331
acquired for or devoted to transportation purposes. When used in 332
this context, right-of-way includes the roadway, shoulders or 333
berm, ditch, and slopes extending to the right-of-way limits 334
under the control of the state or local authority. 335
(VV) "Rural mail delivery vehicle" means every vehicle 336
used to deliver United States mail on a rural mail delivery 337

H. B. No. 367 Page 13
As Introduced
route. 338
(WW) "Funeral escort vehicle" means any motor vehicle, 339
including a funeral hearse, while used to facilitate the 340
movement of a funeral procession. 341
(XX) "Alley" means a street or highway intended to provide 342
access to the rear or side of lots or buildings in urban 343
districts and not intended for the purpose of through vehicular 344
traffic, and includes any street or highway that has been 345
declared an "alley" by the legislative authority of the 346
municipal corporation in which such street or highway is 347
located. 348
(YY) "Freeway" means a divided multi-lane highway for 349
through traffic with all crossroads separated in grade and with 350
full control of access. 351
(ZZ) "Expressway" means a divided arterial highway for 352
through traffic with full or partial control of access with an 353
excess of fifty per cent of all crossroads separated in grade. 354
(AAA) "Thruway" means a through highway whose entire 355
roadway is reserved for through traffic and on which roadway 356
parking is prohibited. 357
(BBB) "Stop intersection" means any intersection at one or 358
more entrances of which stop signs are erected. 359
(CCC) "Arterial street" means any United States or state 360
numbered route, controlled access highway, or other major radial 361
or circumferential street or highway designated by local 362
authorities within their respective jurisdictions as part of a 363
major arterial system of streets or highways. 364
(DDD) "Ridesharing arrangement" means the transportation 365

H. B. No. 367 Page 14
As Introduced
of persons in a motor vehicle where such transportation is 366
incidental to another purpose of a volunteer driver and includes 367
ridesharing arrangements known as carpools, vanpools, and 368
buspools. 369
(EEE) "Motorized wheelchair" means any self-propelled 370
vehicle designed for, and used by, a person with a disability 371
and that is incapable of a speed in excess of eight miles per 372
hour. 373
(FFF) "Child care center" and "type A family child care 374
home" have the same meanings as in section 5104.01 of the 375
Revised Code. 376
(GGG) "Multi-wheel agricultural tractor" means a type of 377
agricultural tractor that has two or more wheels or tires on 378
each side of one axle at the rear of the tractor, is designed or 379
used for drawing other vehicles or wheeled machinery, has no 380
provision for carrying loads independently of the drawn vehicles 381
or machinery, and is used principally for agricultural purposes. 382
(HHH) "Operate" means to cause or have caused movement of 383
a vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley. 384
(III) "Predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense" means 385
any of the following: 386
(1) A violation of section 4511.03, 4511.051, 4511.12, 387
4511.132, 4511.16, 4511.20, 4511.201, 4511.21, 4511.211, 388
4511.213, 4511.22, 4511.23, 4511.25, 4511.26, 4511.27, 4511.28, 389
4511.29, 4511.30, 4511.31, 4511.32, 4511.33, 4511.34, 4511.35, 390
4511.36, 4511.37, 4511.38, 4511.39, 4511.40, 4511.41, 4511.42, 391
4511.43, 4511.431, 4511.432, 4511.44, 4511.441, 4511.451, 392
4511.452, 4511.46, 4511.47, 4511.48, 4511.481, 4511.49, 4511.50, 393
4511.511, 4511.522, 4511.53, 4511.54, 4511.55, 4511.56, 4511.57, 394

H. B. No. 367 Page 15
As Introduced
4511.58, 4511.59, 4511.60, 4511.61, 4511.64, 4511.66, 4511.661, 395
4511.68, 4511.70, 4511.701, 4511.71, 4511.711, 4511.712, 396
4511.713, 4511.72, 4511.73, 4511.763, 4511.771, 4511.78, or 397
4511.84 of the Revised Code; 398
(2) A violation of division (A)(2) of section 4511.17, 399
divisions (A) to (D) of section 4511.51, or division (A) of 400
section 4511.74 of the Revised Code; 401
(3) A violation of any provision of sections 4511.01 to 402
4511.76 of the Revised Code for which no penalty otherwise is 403
provided in the section that contains the provision violated; 404
(4) A violation of section 4511.214 of the Revised Code; 405
(5) A violation of a municipal ordinance that is 406
substantially similar to any section or provision set forth or 407
described in division (III)(1), (2), (3), or (4) of this 408
section. 409
(JJJ) "Road service vehicle" means wreckers, utility 410
repair vehicles, and state, county, and municipal service 411
vehicles equipped with visual signals by means of flashing, 412
rotating, or oscillating lights. 413
(KKK) "Beacon" means a highway traffic signal with one or 414
more signal sections that operate in a flashing mode. 415
(LLL) "Hybrid beacon" means a type of beacon that is 416
intentionally placed in a dark mode between periods of operation 417
where no indications are displayed and, when in operation, 418
displays both steady and flashing traffic control signal 419
indications. 420
(MMM) "Highway traffic signal" means a power-operated 421
traffic control device by which traffic is warned or directed to 422

H. B. No. 367 Page 16
As Introduced
take some specific action. "Highway traffic signal" does not 423
include a power-operated sign, steadily illuminated pavement 424
marker, warning light, or steady burning electric lamp. 425
(NNN) "Median" means the area between two roadways of a 426
divided highway, measured from edge of traveled way to edge of 427
traveled way, but excluding turn lanes. The width of a median 428
may be different between intersections, between interchanges, 429
and at opposite approaches of the same intersection. 430
(OOO) "Private road open to public travel" means a private 431
toll road or road, including any adjacent sidewalks that 432
generally run parallel to the road, within a shopping center, 433
airport, sports arena, or other similar business or recreation 434
facility that is privately owned but where the public is allowed 435
to travel without access restrictions. "Private road open to 436
public travel" includes a gated toll road but does not include a 437
road within a private gated property where access is restricted 438
at all times, a parking area, a driving aisle within a parking 439
area, or a private grade crossing. 440
(PPP) "Shared-use path" means a bikeway outside the 441
traveled way and physically separated from motorized vehicular 442
traffic by an open space or barrier and either within the 443
highway right-of-way or within an independent alignment. A 444
shared-use path also may be used by pedestrians, including 445
skaters, joggers, users of manual and motorized wheelchairs, and 446
other authorized motorized and non-motorized users. A shared-use 447
path does not include any trail that is intended to be used 448
primarily for mountain biking, hiking, equestrian use, or other 449
similar uses, or any other single track or natural surface trail 450
that has historically been reserved for nonmotorized use. 451
(QQQ) "Highway maintenance vehicle" means a vehicle used 452

H. B. No. 367 Page 17
As Introduced
in snow and ice removal or road surface maintenance, including a 453
snow plow, traffic line striper, road sweeper, mowing machine, 454
asphalt distributing vehicle, or other such vehicle designed for 455
use in specific highway maintenance activities. 456
(RRR) "Waste collection vehicle" means a vehicle used in 457
the collection of garbage, refuse, trash, or recyclable 458
materials. 459
(SSS) "Electric bicycle" means a "class 1 electric 460
bicycle," a "class 2 electric bicycle," or a "class 3 electric 461
bicycle" as defined in this section. 462
(TTT) "Class 1 electric bicycle" means a bicycle that is 463
equipped with fully operable pedals and an electric motor of 464
less than seven hundred fifty watts that provides assistance 465
only when the rider is pedaling and ceases to provide assistance 466
when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour. 467
(UUU) "Class 2 electric bicycle" means a bicycle that is 468
equipped with fully operable pedals and an electric motor of 469
less than seven hundred fifty watts that may provide assistance 470
regardless of whether the rider is pedaling and is not capable 471
of providing assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of 472
twenty miles per hour. 473
(VVV) "Class 3 electric bicycle" means a bicycle that is 474
equipped with fully operable pedals and an electric motor of 475
less than seven hundred fifty watts that provides assistance 476
only when the rider is pedaling and ceases to provide assistance 477
when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty-eight miles per 478
hour. 479
(WWW) "Low-speed micromobility device" means a device 480
weighing less than one hundred pounds that has handlebars, is 481

H. B. No. 367 Page 18
As Introduced
propelled by an electric motor or human power, and has an 482
attainable speed on a paved level surface of not more than 483
twenty miles per hour when propelled by the electric motor. 484
(XXX) "Natural resources officer" means an officer 485
appointed pursuant to section 1501.24 of the Revised Code. 486
(YYY) "Wildlife officer" means an officer designated 487
pursuant to section 1531.13 of the Revised Code. 488
(ZZZ) "Dedicated organ recovery vehicle" means a vehicle 489
to which all of the following apply: 490
(1) It is dedicated to or contracted with an organ 491
procurement organization. 492
(2) It is clearly labeled with the words "organ recovery 493
vehicle." 494
(3) It is being used for the purpose of transporting human 495
organs. 496
(4) It is being operated by a driver to whom both of the 497
following apply: 498
(a) The driver has successfully completed the emergency 499
vehicle operations course approved by the national highway 500
traffic safety administration or an equivalent course approved 501
by the state board of emergency medical, fire, and 502
transportation services. 503
(b) The driver has at least three years of experience in 504
the use and operation of emergency lights and sirens. 505
Sec. 4511.042. (A) Sections 4511.25, 4511.26, 4511.27, 506
4511.28, 4511.29, 4511.30, 4511.31, 4511.32, 4511.33, 4511.35, 507
4511.36, 4511.37, 4511.38, and 4511.66 of the Revised Code do 508

H. B. No. 367 Page 19
As Introduced
not apply to a any of the following: 509
(1) A coroner, deputy coroner, or coroner's investigator 510
operating a motor vehicle in accordance with section 4513.171 of 511
the Revised Code; 512
(2) The driver of a dedicated organ recovery vehicle 513
operating that vehicle in accordance with sections 4513.17 and 514
4513.21 of the Revised Code. This 515
(B) This section does not relieve a coroner, deputy 516
coroner, or coroner's investigator operating a motor vehicle , 517
or dedicated organ recovery vehicle driver from the duty to 518
drive with due regard for the safety of all persons and property 519
upon the highway. 520
Sec. 4511.213. (A) The driver of a motor vehicle, upon 521
approaching a stationary public safety vehicle, emergency 522
vehicle, dedicated organ recovery vehicle, road service vehicle, 523
waste collection vehicle, vehicle used by the public utilities 524
commission to conduct motor vehicle inspections in accordance 525
with sections 4923.04 and 4923.06 of the Revised Code, or a 526
highway maintenance vehicle that is displaying the appropriate 527
visual signals by means of flashing, oscillating, or rotating 528
lights, as prescribed in section 4513.17 of the Revised Code, 529
shall do either of the following: 530
(1) If the driver of the motor vehicle is traveling on a 531
highway that consists of at least two lanes that carry traffic 532
in the same direction of travel as that of the driver's motor 533
vehicle, the driver shall proceed with due caution and, if 534
possible and with due regard to the road, weather, and traffic 535
conditions, shall change lanes into a lane that is not adjacent 536
to that of the stationary public safety vehicle, emergency 537

H. B. No. 367 Page 20
As Introduced
vehicle, dedicated organ recovery vehicle, road service vehicle, 538
waste collection vehicle, vehicle used by the public utilities 539
commission to conduct motor vehicle inspections in accordance 540
with sections 4923.04 and 4923.06 of the Revised Code, or a 541
highway maintenance vehicle. 542
(2) If the driver is not traveling on a highway of a type 543
described in division (A)(1) of this section, or if the driver 544
is traveling on a highway of that type but it is not possible to 545
change lanes or if to do so would be unsafe, the driver shall 546
proceed with due caution, reduce the speed of the motor vehicle, 547
and maintain a safe speed for the road, weather, and traffic 548
conditions. 549
(B) This section does not relieve the driver of a public 550
safety vehicle, emergency vehicle, dedicated organ recovery 551
vehicle, road service vehicle, waste collection vehicle, vehicle 552
used by the public utilities commission to conduct motor vehicle 553
inspections in accordance with sections 4923.04 and 4923.06 of 554
the Revised Code, or a highway maintenance vehicle from the duty 555
to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons and 556
property upon the highway. 557
(C) No person shall fail to drive a motor vehicle in 558
compliance with division (A)(1) or (2) of this section when so 559
required by division (A) of this section. 560
(D)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this division, 561
whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. 562
If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has 563
been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor 564
vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is 565
guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one 566
year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted 567

H. B. No. 367 Page 21
As Introduced
of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, 568
whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the 569
third degree. 570
(2) Notwithstanding section 2929.28 of the Revised Code, 571
upon a finding that a person operated a motor vehicle in 572
violation of division (C) of this section, the court, in 573
addition to all other penalties provided by law, shall impose a 574
fine of two times the usual amount imposed for the violation. 575
(3) If the offender commits the offense while distracted 576
and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the 577
commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the 578
additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the 579
Revised Code. 580
(E) The offense established under this section is a strict 581
liability offense and section 2901.20 of the Revised Code does 582
not apply. The designation of this offense as a strict liability 583
offense shall not be construed to imply that any other offense, 584
for which there is no specified degree of culpability, is not a 585
strict liability offense. 586
Sec. 4511.45. (A)(1) Upon the approach of a public safety 587
vehicle, dedicated organ recovery vehicle, or coroner's vehicle, 588
equipped with at least one flashing, rotating, or oscillating 589
light visible under normal atmospheric conditions from a 590
distance of five hundred feet to the front of the vehicle and 591
the driver is giving an audible signal by siren, exhaust 592
whistle, or bell, no driver of any other vehicle shall fail to 593
yield the right-of-way, immediately drive if practical to a 594
position parallel to, and as close as possible to, the right 595
edge or curb of the highway clear of any intersection, and stop 596
and remain in that position until the public safety vehicle, 597

H. B. No. 367 Page 22
As Introduced
dedicated organ recovery vehicle, or coroner's vehicle has 598
passed, except when otherwise directed by a police officer. 599
(2) Upon the approach of a public safety vehicle, 600
dedicated organ recovery vehicle, or coroner's vehicle, as 601
stated in division (A)(1) of this section, no operator of any 602
streetcar or trackless trolley shall fail to immediately stop 603
the streetcar or trackless trolley clear of any intersection and 604
keep it in that position until the public safety vehicle, 605
dedicated organ recovery vehicle, or coroner's vehicle has 606
passed, except when otherwise directed by a police officer. 607
(B) This section does not relieve the driver of a public 608
safety vehicle, dedicated organ recovery vehicle, or coroner's 609
vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of 610
all persons and property upon the highway. 611
(C)(C)(1) This section applies to a coroner's vehicle only 612
when the vehicle is operated in accordance with section 4513.171 613
of the Revised Code. As used in this section, "coroner's 614
vehicle" means a vehicle used by a coroner, deputy coroner, or 615
coroner's investigator that is equipped with a flashing, 616
oscillating, or rotating red or blue light and a siren, exhaust 617
whistle, or bell capable of giving an audible signal. 618
(2) This section applies to a dedicated organ recovery 619
vehicle only when the dedicated organ recovery vehicle is 620
operated in accordance with sections 4513.17 and 4513.21 of the 621
Revised Code. 622
(D) Except as otherwise provided in this division or in 623
section 4511.454 of the Revised Code, whoever violates division 624
(A)(1) or (2) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the 625
fourth degree on a first offense. On a second offense within one 626

H. B. No. 367 Page 23
As Introduced
year after the first offense, the person is guilty of a 627
misdemeanor of the third degree, and, on each subsequent offense 628
within one year after the first offense, the person is guilty of 629
a misdemeanor of the second degree. 630
Sec. 4513.17. (A) Whenever a motor vehicle equipped with 631
headlights also is equipped with any auxiliary lights or 632
spotlight or any other light on the front thereof projecting a 633
beam of an intensity greater than three hundred candle power, 634
not more than a total of five of any such lights on the front of 635
a vehicle shall be lighted at any one time when the vehicle is 636
upon a highway. 637
(B) Any lighted light or illuminating device upon a motor 638
vehicle, other than headlights, spotlights, signal lights, or 639
auxiliary driving lights, that projects a beam of light of an 640
intensity greater than three hundred candle power, shall be so 641
directed that no part of the beam will strike the level of the 642
roadway on which the vehicle stands at a distance of more than 643
seventy-five feet from the vehicle. 644
(C)(1) Flashing lights are prohibited on motor vehicles, 645
except as a means for indicating a right or a left turn, or in 646
the presence of a vehicular traffic hazard requiring unusual 647
care in approaching, or overtaking or passing. 648
(2) The prohibition in division (C)(1) of this section 649
does not apply to any of the following: 650
(a) Emergency vehicles, dedicated organ recovery vehicles, 651
road service vehicles servicing or towing a disabled vehicle, 652
stationary waste collection vehicles actively collecting 653
garbage, refuse, trash, or recyclable materials on the roadside, 654
rural mail delivery vehicles, vehicles as provided in section 655

H. B. No. 367 Page 24
As Introduced
4513.182 of the Revised Code, highway maintenance vehicles, and 656
similar equipment operated by the department or local 657
authorities, provided such vehicles are equipped with and 658
display, when used on a street or highway for the special 659
purpose necessitating such lights, a flashing, oscillating, or 660
rotating amber light; 661
(b) Vehicles or machinery permitted by section 4513.111 of 662
the Revised Code to have a flashing red light; 663
(c) Farm machinery and vehicles escorting farm machinery, 664
provided such machinery and vehicles are equipped with and 665
display, when used on a street or highway, a flashing, 666
oscillating, or rotating amber light. Farm machinery also may 667
display the lights described in section 4513.111 of the Revised 668
Code. 669
(d) A funeral hearse or funeral escort vehicle, provided 670
that the funeral hearse or funeral escort vehicle is equipped 671
with and displays, when used on a street or highway for the 672
special purpose necessitating such lights, a flashing, 673
oscillating, or rotating purple or amber light; 674
(e) A vehicle being used for emergency preparedness, 675
response, and recovery activities, as those terms are defined in 676
section 5502.21 of the Revised Code, that is equipped with and 677
displays, when used on a street or highway for the special 678
purpose necessitating such lights, a flashing, oscillating, or 679
rotating amber or red and white light, provided that the vehicle 680
is being operated by a person from one of the following and the 681
vehicle is clearly marked with the applicable agency's or 682
authority's insignia: 683
(i) The Ohio emergency management agency; 684

H. B. No. 367 Page 25
As Introduced
(ii) A countywide emergency management agency established 685
under section 5502.26 of the Revised Code; 686
(iii) A regional authority for emergency management 687
established under section 5502.27 of the Revised Code; 688
(iv) A program for emergency management established under 689
section 5502.271 of the Revised Code. 690
(3) Division (C)(1) of this section does not apply to 691
animal-drawn vehicles subject to section 4513.114 of the Revised 692
Code. 693
(D)(1) Except a person operating a public safety vehicle, 694
as defined in division (E) of section 4511.01 of the Revised 695
Code, an emergency management agency vehicle, as described in 696
division (C)(2)(e) of this section, or a school bus, no person 697
shall operate, move, or park upon, or permit to stand within the 698
right-of-way of any public street or highway any vehicle or 699
equipment that is equipped with and displaying a flashing red or 700
a flashing combination red and white light, or an oscillating or 701
rotating red light, or a combination red and white oscillating 702
or rotating light. 703
(2) Except a public law enforcement officer, or other 704
person sworn to enforce the criminal and traffic laws of the 705
state, operating a public safety vehicle when on duty, no person 706
shall operate, move, or park upon, or permit to stand within the 707
right-of-way of any street or highway any vehicle or equipment 708
that is equipped with, or upon which is mounted, and displaying 709
a flashing blue or a flashing combination blue and white light, 710
or an oscillating or rotating blue light, or a combination blue 711
and white oscillating or rotating light. 712
(E) This section does not prohibit the use of warning 713

H. B. No. 367 Page 26
As Introduced
lights required by law or the simultaneous flashing of turn 714
signals on disabled vehicles or on vehicles being operated in 715
unfavorable atmospheric conditions in order to enhance their 716
visibility. This section also does not prohibit the simultaneous 717
flashing of turn signals or warning lights either on farm 718
machinery or vehicles escorting farm machinery, when used on a 719
street or highway. 720
(F) Whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor 721
misdemeanor. 722
Sec. 4513.21. (A) Every motor vehicle or trackless trolley 723
when operated upon a highway shall be equipped with a horn which 724
is in good working order and capable of emitting sound audible, 725
under normal conditions, from a distance of not less than two 726
hundred feet. 727
No (B) Except as provided in divisions (D)(1) and (2) of 728
this section, no motor vehicle or trackless trolley shall be 729
equipped with, nor shall any person use upon a vehicle, any 730
siren, whistle, or bell. Any 731
(C) Any vehicle may be equipped with a theft alarm signal 732
device which shall be so arranged that it cannot be used as an 733
ordinary warning signal. Every 734
(D)(1) Every emergency vehicle shall be equipped with a 735
siren, whistle, or bell, capable of emitting sound audible under 736
normal conditions from a distance of not less than five hundred 737
feet and of a type approved by the director of public safety. 738
Such equipment shall not be used except when such vehicle is 739
operated in response to an emergency call or is in the immediate 740
pursuit of an actual or suspected violator of the law, in which 741
case the driver of the emergency vehicle shall sound such 742

H. B. No. 367 Page 27
As Introduced
equipment when it is necessary to warn pedestrians and other 743
drivers of the approach thereof. 744
(2) A dedicated organ recovery vehicle may be equipped 745
with a siren, whistle, or bell, capable of emitting sound 746
audible under normal conditions from a distance of not less than 747
five hundred feet and of a type approved by the director of 748
public safety. Such equipment shall not be used except when such 749
vehicle is transporting a human organ, in which case the driver 750
of the vehicle shall sound such equipment when it is necessary 751
to warn pedestrians and other drivers of the approach thereof. 752
(B) (E) Whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor 753
misdemeanor. 754
Section 2. That existing sections 4511.01, 4511.042, 755
4511.213, 4511.45, 4513.17, and 4513.21 of the Revised Code are 756
hereby repealed. 757
Section 3. Section 4511.213 of the Revised Code is 758
presented in this act as a composite of the section as amended 759
by both H.B. 95 and S.B. 127 of the 132nd General Assembly. The 760
General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) 761
of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be 762
harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, 763
finds that the composite is the resulting version of the section 764
in effect prior to the effective date of the section as 765
presented in this act. 766